Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
County Through Road Systems

178.300.
Road passing over or obstructed by dam.

Where a county road passes over a dam, the owner or occupier of the dam shall keep such dam in good order and at least fourteen (14) feet wide at the top. He shall also keep in good order a bridge of like width over the pierhead, floodgates or any waste cut through or around the dam and shall erect and keep in good order a strong railing on both sides of such bridges or dam.

Every owner of a dam built after 1914, which dam, or the race or ditch connected therewith, obstructs any county road by the backing of water or otherwise, shall whenever it is necessary for the safe and convenient crossing of the same, or the pond created thereby, build and keep in repair over the dam, pond, race or ditch, a bridge like that specified in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

4322.

178.310.
County roads taken for railroad purposes — Correction of unsafe conditions.

The fiscal court of a county in which any county road or portion thereof is taken for railroad purposes may, upon petition of any party interested, served upon the railroad company as any other civil process, appoint a committee of three (3) to inquire whether the road or portion thereof is unsafe for travel by reason of the railroad, and whether an alteration of the old road or the construction of a new road is necessary.

The committee shall examine the place where the danger is complained of, and shall give fifteen (15) days’ written notice to the persons making the complaint and the persons complained of, of an opportunity to be heard. After the hearing, the committee shall report its findings to the fiscal court, which may make an order concerning the matter.

If the fiscal court orders any alteration or construction, and the railroad company fails to comply with the order, the fiscal court shall have the work done and may recover the cost from the railroad company, in the same manner that the cost of removing obstructions is recovered under KRS

179.280

.

This section shall not apply to street railways or to public roads located in incorporated cities which have control of their roads, streets and alleys, or to roads which have been constructed since the railroad.

History.

4351: amended Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 312, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Penalty for breach of this section, KRS

179.990

.

178.320.
Title to rights-of-way and records of discontinued roads to be filed in county clerk’s office.

The county road engineer shall turn over to the county clerk all documents of title to all rights-of-way, whether acquired by gift or condemnation, and all documents relating to discontinuations of public roads, including maps, plats and surveys.

The county clerk shall keep on convenient file or in books prepared for that purpose a complete record of all such documents.

History.

4297, 4321.

178.330.
County through road system for county containing city of first class or consolidated local government — Establishment — Effect.

It is hereby declared that in counties containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government a system of county through roads over which traffic can be routed or which can serve as major connecting links to state highways is a necessary and integral part of a unified system of highways, roads, and streets needed for the movement of traffic in such a metropolitan area and that the construction, reconstruction, widening, relocation, repair, maintenance, and improvement of such a system of county through roads is a proper and legitimate public function as an alternative to other authorizations or requirements.

The fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or the consolidated local government, acting upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation by the county road engineer, may designate for purposes of construction, reconstruction, widening, relocation, repair, maintenance, and improvement from among the public roads within the county certain roads proposed to constitute the “county through road system.” County through roads may include:

Main traveled roads;

Roads in unincorporated areas necessary for the circulation of traffic within the county;

Streets and roads through, within, or adjacent to cities of any class necessary for the circulation of traffic within the county; or

Major roads connecting two (2) primary roads maintained by the state.

County through roads shall not include roads on the state highway system.

As soon as the proposed county through roads are designated as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fiscal court or a consolidated local government shall cause such county through roads to be marked on a map to be deposited with the county road engineer and to be open to public inspection. Upon the filing of the map, the clerk of the fiscal court or the clerk of a consolidated local government shall, in conformance with KRS 424.130(1)(b), have published in a newspaper of bona fide general circulation within the county:

A notice of the proposed adoption of a county through road system;

A description of roads or portions thereof proposed to be included;

Notice of the date upon which the fiscal court or a consolidated local government will consider the adoption of the county through road system; and

Notice that the map of the proposed county through road system is open to inspection in the office of the county road engineer.

At any time before the adoption of the county through road system, any freeholder of the county may file a petition with the county road engineer asking for any change in the designated county through roads, setting forth the reason for the proposed change. Such petition shall be accompanied by a plat showing such proposed change. Any such petition shall be considered by the fiscal court or the consolidated local government at its meeting held on the date advertised in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. The fiscal court or the consolidated local government may accept or reject any such suggested changes in the proposed county through road system. The fiscal court or the consolidated local government may continue the consideration to a later meeting which must be advertised as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The roads which the fiscal court or the consolidated local government so designated by official resolution shall be conclusively established as the county through road system.

Classifications or designations of a county through road system established by this section shall not affect or change classifications or designations made by other sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes such as “county roads,” “main county roads,” “rural and secondary roads,” “turnpikes,” “city streets,” or similar terms; except that when there is an irreconcilable conflict arising from the actual application of this section in a given instance and a designation or classification made in other sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, this section shall prevail. Nothing in KRS

178.020

to

178.040

,

178.117

,

178.330

to

178.337

,

179.070

, and

179.330

shall preclude the expenditure on the county through road system, including portions within cities, of state funds allocated for public highways under the provisions of KRS

179.410

and

179.415

, or

177.320

to

177.369

, or any other section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes in accordance with the provisions of KRS

177.330

,

177.340

, or

179.440

.

The provisions of KRS

178.050

to

178.100

shall not apply to a county through road system established or maintained under KRS

178.330

to

178.337

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 1; 1980, ch. 188, § 136, effective July 15, 1980; 2002, ch. 346, § 186, effective July 15, 2002.

178.333.
Addition of roads to through road system for county containing city of first class or consolidated local government — New roads — Relocation.

The fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government may, at any time, add other roads, or portions of roads, to the county through road system adopted in accordance with KRS

178.330

. The fiscal court or a consolidated local government shall cause the proposed addition to be marked on a map to be deposited with the county road engineer and to be open to public inspection. The same procedure set forth in KRS

178.330

for the establishment or maintenance of the county through road system shall be followed in the case of roads or portions of roads added thereto. Notice of the proposed addition to the system shall conform to KRS 424.130(1)(b).

The fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government may establish or maintain a new road in compliance with the provisions of KRS

178.115

to

178.125

, or relocate a road in accordance with KRS

178.115

, and at the same time add it to the county through road system, following the same procedure as is now set forth in KRS

178.330

and subsection (1) of this section, including notice in accordance with KRS 424.130(1)(b).

The decisions of the fiscal court or the consolidated local government made in accordance with this section shall be final.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 2; 2002, ch. 346, § 187, effective July 15, 2002.

178.337.
Removal of road from system — When city streets in system.

After an engineering and traffic investigation and the receipt of recommendations by the county road engineer, a county through road or a portion thereof established or maintained as provided in KRS

178.330

may be detached from the county through road system. The fiscal court or the consolidated local government shall cause the proposed deletion to be marked on a map to be deposited with county road engineer and to be open to public inspection. The same procedure set forth in KRS

178.330

for the establishment or maintenance of a county through road system shall be followed in the case of roads or portions of roads detached therefrom. Notice of the proposed deletion from the system shall conform to KRS 424.130(1)(b). The fiscal court or the consolidated local government may in its discretion detach or retain the road as a part of the county through road system. The decisions of the fiscal court or the consolidated local government made in accordance with this section shall be final. Whenever any county through road has been added or detached from the county through road system in accordance with KRS 178.330 to

178.337

, the county road engineer shall accordingly amend the map of the county through road system, which map shall at all times be available for public inspection in the office of the county road engineer. Nothing herein shall be construed as automatically deleting from the county through road system any portion of the system in territory which becomes incorporated as a city or which becomes annexed to a city.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to take from the jurisdiction or control of the legislative body of any incorporated city or consolidated local government, any road, bridge, landing, or wharf, or any other thing exclusively under the jurisdiction or control of such city or a consolidated local government. Provided, however, that roads within a city in a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government may be made a part of the county through road system, in accordance with KRS

178.330

or

178.333

, or both, with the agreement of the legislative body of said city.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any fiscal court or a consolidated local government from acquiring land by gift for public purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 313, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 346, § 188, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 251, effective January 1, 2015.